test/src/morphology/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - suohkat: # SUOHKAT
    suohkat+A+Attr: suohkkis
    suohkat+A+Sg+Nom: suohkat 
    suohkat+A+Sg+Acc: suohkadav 
    suohkat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: suohkadabbo
    suohkat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: suohkadamos
    suohkat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: suohkadappusj
    suohkat+A+Der/at+Adv: suohkadit
    suohkat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: suohkadapputjit
    suohkat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: suohkkisvuohta

  Adjective - tjårggåt: # SUOHKAT
    tjårggåt+A+Attr: tjårggis 
    tjårggåt+A+Sg+Nom: tjårggåt 
    tjårggåt+A+Sg+Ine: tjårggådin
    tjårggåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjårggådabbo
    tjårggåt+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjårggådamos
    tjårggåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: tjårggådappusj
    tjårggåt+A+Der/at+Adv: tjårggådit
    tjårggåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: tjårggådapputjit
    tjårggåt+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjårggisvuohta

  Adjective - duolbbat: # SUOHKAT and LEXATTR
    duolbbat+A+Attr: [duolbbis, duolbba]
    duolbbat+A+Sg+Nom: duolbbat 
    duolbbat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: duolbbadabbo
    duolbbat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: duolbbadamos

  Adjective - jalggat: # SUOHKAT, LEXATTR
    jalggat+A+Attr: [jalgga, jalggis]
    jalggat+A+Sg+Nom: jalggat 
    jalggat+A+Sg+Com: jalggadijn 
    jalggat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jalggadabbo
    jalggat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jalggadamos
    jalggat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [jalggavuohta, jalggisvuohta]
    jalggat+A+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: jalggatvuohta

  Adjective - ruoppsat: #  SUOHKAT
    ruoppsat+A+Attr: ruoppsis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsat
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Gen: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Acc: ruoppsadav
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ill: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ine: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ela: ruoppsadis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Com: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Nom: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Gen: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Acc: ruoppsadijt
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ill: ruoppsadijda
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ine: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ela: ruoppsadijs
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Com: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Ess: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadabbo
    ruoppsat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadamos

  Adjective - låssåt: # LÅSSÅT
    låssåt+A+Attr: [låssis,låsså]
    låssåt+A+Sg+Nom: låssåt
    låssåt+A+Sg+Gen: låssåda
    låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [låsep, låssådabbo]
    låssåt+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [låsemus, låssådamos]
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [låsebusj,låssådappusj]
    låssåt+A+Der/at+Adv: låssådit
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [låsebuttjat,låssådapputjit]
    låssåt+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [låssisvuohta, låssåvuohta]

  Adjective - sjkærnja: # TSIBTSA
    sjkærnja+A+Attr: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Nom: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Com: sjkærnnjagijn
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagabbo
    sjkærnja+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagamos
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: sjkærnnjagappot
    sjkærnja+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: sjkærnnjagabmusit
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagappusj
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: sjkærnnjagapputjit
    sjkærnja+A+Der/at+Adv: sjkærnnjagit
    sjkærnja+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sjkærnjavuohta

  Adjective - bielljis: # TJALMMIS
    bielljis+A+Attr: [bielljis, bielljisis]
    bielljis+A+Sg+Nom: bielljis
    bielljis+A+Sg+Com: bielljisijn
    bielljis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: bielljisabbo
    bielljis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bielljisamos
    bielljis+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: bielljisappot
    bielljis+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: bielljisabmusit
    bielljis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: bielljisappusj
    bielljis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: bielljisapputjit
    bielljis+A+Der/at+Adv: bielljisit
    bielljis+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: bielljisvuohta

  Adjective - rádas: # RÁDAS and LEXATTR
    rádas+A+Attr: [rádas,ráda]
    rádas+A+Sg+Nom: rádas
    rádas+A+Sg+Acc: ráddasav
    rádas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ráddasabbo
    rádas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ráddasamos
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: ráddasappot
    rádas+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: ráddasabmusit
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: ráddasappusj
    rádas+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: ráddasapputjit
    rádas+A+Der/at+Adv: ráddasit
    rádas+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: rádasvuohta

  Adjective - ieŋŋils: # IENNILS
    ieŋŋils+A+Attr: []
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom: ieŋŋils
    ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc: ieŋŋilsav
    ieŋŋils+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    ieŋŋils+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
